Wisconsin, session 2025, SB670.
do enact as follows:SB670,11Section 1. 27.01 (7) (g) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:SB670,2,5327.01 (7) (g) 2. Except as provided in subds. 3. and 4., the department shall 4charge a at least a $19.85 fee for a daily vehicle admission receipt, as determined 5by the secretary, for any vehicle that has a registration plate from another state.SB670,26Section 2. 29.563 (2) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,7729.563 (2) (b) 1. Annual small game: $87.25 $107.25.SB670,38Section 3. 29.563 (2) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,9929.563 (2) (b) 2. Five-day small game: $57.25 $67.25.SB670,410Section 4. 29.563 (2) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,111129.563 (2) (b) 3. Deer: $197.25 $237.25.SB670,512Section 5. 29.563 (2) (b) 3m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,131329.563 (2) (b) 3m. Elk: $248.25 $268.25.SB670,614Section 6. 29.563 (2) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,151529.563 (2) (b) 4. Class A bear: $248.25 $288.25.SB670,716Section 7. 29.563 (2) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,171729.563 (2) (b) 6. Archer: $197.25 $237.25.SB670,818Section 8. 29.563 (2) (b) 6m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,191929.563 (2) (b) 6m. Crossbow: $197.25 $237.25.SB670,920Section 9. 29.563 (2) (b) 7. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,212129.563 (2) (b) 7. Fur-bearing animal: $162.25 $182.25.SB670,1022Section 10. 29.563 (2) (b) 8. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,2,232329.563 (2) (b) 8. Wild turkey: $62.25 $82.25.SB670,1124Section 11. 29.563 (2) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,2129.563 (2) (d) 1. Bonus deer issued for the purpose specified in s. 29.181 (2) (a) 21.: $19.25 $39.25.SB670,123Section 12. 29.563 (2) (d) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,6429.563 (2) (d) 2. Bonus deer issued for the purpose specified in s. 29.181 (2) (a) 52.: $5.75 $25.75 or, if a fee is established by rule under s. 29.181 (4), the fee 6established by rule.SB670,137Section 13. 29.563 (2) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,10829.563 (2) (g) Nonresident authorizations. Each additional wild turkey 9hunting authorization issued to a nonresident under s. 29.164 (4) (b): $14.75 10$24.75.SB670,1411Section 14. 29.563 (2g) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,141229.563 (2g) Reduced fees for certain archer and crossbow licenses. 13(intro.) Notwithstanding the fees under sub. (2) (a) 8. and 8r. and (b) 6. and 6m., the 14fee is $2.25 $22.25 for any of the following licenses:SB670,1515Section 15. 29.563 (3) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,161629.563 (3) (b) 1. Annual: $54.25 $64.25.SB670,1617Section 16. 29.563 (3) (b) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,181829.563 (3) (b) 2. Annual family: $69.25 $89.25.SB670,1719Section 17. 29.563 (3) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,202029.563 (3) (b) 3. Fifteen-day: $32.25 $42.25.SB670,1821Section 18. 29.563 (3) (b) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,222229.563 (3) (b) 4. Fifteen-day family: $44.25 $54.25.SB670,1923Section 19. 29.563 (3) (b) 5. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,3,242429.563 (3) (b) 5. Four-day: $28.25 $38.25.SB670,201Section 20. 29.563 (3) (b) 5m. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,4,2229.563 (3) (b) 5m. One-day: $14.25 $24.25.SB670,213Section 21. 29.563 (3) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB670,4,4429.563 (3) (b) 6. Two-day sports: $9.25 $19.25. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb670 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb670 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB670 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB670 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB670: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting